District of Columbia statutes.
47-2807

Construction and definition of terms.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term “person” shall signify and include firms, corporations, companies, associations, executives, administrators, guardians, or trustees; the term “agent” shall signify and include every person acting for another; the term “merchandise” shall signify and include every article of commerce whether sold in bulk or otherwise; the term “dealers” shall signify and include every person engaged in selling or offering for sale any description of merchandise or property. Words of 1 number shall signify and include words of both numbers, respectively, and words of 1 gender shall signify and include words of every gender, respectively; provided, that nothing in this chapter shall be interpreted as repealing any specific act of Congress or any of the police or building regulations of the District of Columbia regarding the establishment or conduct of the businesses, trades, professions, or callings named in this chapter and not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter.

July 1, 1902, 32 Stat. 623, ch. 1352, § 7, par. 7
July 1, 1932, 47 Stat. 551, ch. 366
Apr. 30, 1988, D.C. Law 7-104, § 43(d), 35 DCR 147
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1973 Ed., § 47-2307.
1981 Ed., § 47-2807.
Mayor, Council and other offices, application of certain sections to boards, commissions and committees, see § 1-321.02.